Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-17-100.
Effect of funding on provisions for benefits and annuities; coverage of claims before funds available; credit for service after February 1, 1950, but before this effective date.

The provisions of this chapter relating to benefits and annuities shall not become operative until after the funds necessary to carry out this chapter have been provided. All claims for annuities or benefits arising before such funds are made available shall not be covered by this chapter; and the board is directed not to pay any annuities or benefits based upon any such claim; but, for the purpose of computing the length of service under this chapter, the board shall be authorized to include the period of time elapsing between February 1, 1950, and the date that it becomes operative.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, § 17.

47-17-101.
Vesting of rights under this chapter.

All rights and benefits under this chapter shall be subject to future legislative change or revision, and no beneficiary shall be deemed to have any vested right to any annuities or benefits under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, § 18.

47-17-102.
Reduction of benefits upon determination that available funds are insufficient; liability of members of the board for such reductions.

If at any time the amounts derived from the different sources provided in this chapter are not sufficient to enable the board to pay in full each person determined to be entitled to annuities or benefits under this chapter, then each beneficiary shall receive a prorated percentage of the monthly benefits otherwise payable until the fund is sufficiently replenished to warrant the resumption thereafter of full payments of such annuities or benefits to each beneficiary. In no event shall the board, or any member of the board, be liable to any beneficiary or the representatives of any beneficiary for any deficiencies in payments made under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, § 14; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

47-17-103.
Exemption of rights and benefits under this chapter from taxation; exemption from garnishment, attachment, or other process; assignability.

The right to any pension, annuity, allowance, or benefit; to the return of contributions; to a pension, annuity, allowance or benefit itself; to any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under this chapter; and to moneys under this chapter shall be exempt from any tax imposed by this state, county, municipal, or other political subdivision, except as provided in Code Section 48-7-27; exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever; and shall be unassignable unless otherwise specifically provided for in this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 39, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1449, § 10.

47-17-104.
Attempts to defraud the fund by false information; failure to remit sums provided for in Code Section 47-17-60.

Any person who knowingly furnishes false information for the purpose of becoming a member of the fund, for receiving credit for service to which he is not entitled, or for receiving benefits hereunder or any person who knowingly assists in doing any of the foregoing things shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person whose duty it is to remit the sum provided for in Code Section 47-17-60 and who fails or refuses to remit such sum shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, § 15; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

47-17-105.
Member’s obligation to notify board of employment change.

If at any time a member of the fund undergoes a change of employment to a position that does not qualify the member as a “peace officer” as such term is defined in this chapter, or if his or her job description changes in a manner that is inconsistent with such definition, such member shall have an affirmative duty to notify the board of such change immediately. The board is not authorized to accept membership dues from any such member or to pay benefits calculated on service after such a change of employment or job description.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-17-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 809, § 1/HB 987.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012.